New Jersey, session 221, A1939.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.2C:14-4 is amended to read as follows: 2C:14-4.     a.         A person commits a disorderly persons offense if 1the person1: (1)  [he] 1[the person]1 does any flagrantly lewd and offensive act which [he] the person knows or reasonably expects is likely to be observed by other nonconsenting persons who would be affronted or alarmed; or (2)   1[the person]1 knowingly transmits by electronic means visual material that depicts a person engaging in sexual conduct or with the persons intimate parts exposed and the recipient did not request or expressly consent to receiving the material. b.    A person commits a crime of the fourth degree if 1the person1: (1)  1[He]1 exposes 1[his] the persons1 intimate parts, via an unsolicited electronic lewd image or in person, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of the 1[actor] person1 or of any other person under circumstances where the 1[actor] person1 knows or reasonably expects 1[he] the person1 is likely to be observed by a child who is less than 13 years of age where the 1[actor] person1 is at least four years older than the child. (2)  1[He]1 exposes 1[his] the persons1 intimate parts, via an unsolicited electronic lewd image or in person, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of the 1[actor] person1 or of any other person under circumstances where the 1[actor] person1 knows or reasonably expects 1[he] the person1 is likely to be observed by a person who because of mental disease or defect is unable to understand the sexual nature of the 1[actor's] persons1 conduct. c.     As used in this section: electronic means includes, but is not limited to, an electronic communication device, an interactive wireless communications device, or a computer. "lewd acts" shall include the exposing of the genitals, via electronic means or in person, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of the 1[actor] person1 or of any other person. (cf: P.L.1992, c.8, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.